Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
Cross references.

Election and term of members, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. II, Para. V.

Legislative privileges and immunity, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IV, Para. IX.

Advertisement of notice to introduce local legislation, Ga. Const., 1983, Art. III, Sec. V, Para. IX.

Exercise of powers, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI.

Special sessions of the General Assembly, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. II, Para. VII.

Rules of statutory construction, §

1-1-1

et seq. and §

1-3-1

et seq.

Grounds for continuance of case applicable to members and staff of General Assembly, §

9-10-150

.

Legislator attending General Assembly excused as a witness, §

9-10-159

.

Exemption from jury duty for members of General Assembly, §

15-12-2

.

Date of election for offices, §

21-2-9

.

Vacancies and special elections for members of General Assembly, §

21-2-544

.

Reporting of contributions made to members of General Assembly during legislative session, §

21-5-35

.

Legislators’ exemption from attending or testifying at hearing or trial during legislative session, §

24-13-29

.

Ongoing review of effectiveness of and continued need for regulatory agencies, §

43-2-1

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 6: The Review, Creation, and Extension of Georgia Tax Credits and Deductions,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 167, 168 (2021).